Utah statutes.
57-25-105.   Validity -- Effect on other instruments.
(1)  An environmental covenant that complies with this chapter runs with the
land.
(2)  An environmental covenant that is otherwise effective is valid and
enforceable even if:
(a)  it is not appurtenant to an interest in real property;
(b)  it can be or has been assigned to a person other than the original
holder;
(c)  it is not of a character that has been recognized traditionally at common
law;
(d)  it imposes a negative burden;
(e)  it imposes an affirmative obligation on a person having an interest in
the real property or on the holder;
(f)  the benefit or burden does not touch or concern real property;
(g)  there is no privity of estate or contract;
(h)  the holder dies, ceases to exist, resigns, or is replaced; or
(i)  the owner of an interest subject to the environmental covenant and the
holder are the same person.
(3) (a)  An instrument that creates restrictions or obligations with respect
to real property that would qualify as activity and use limitations except for
the fact that the instrument was recorded before the effective date of this
chapter is not invalid or unenforceable because of any of the limitations on
enforcement of interests described in Subsection (2) or because it was
identified as an easement, servitude, deed restriction, or other interest.
(b)  This chapter does not apply in any other respect to an instrument covered
under Subsection (3)(a).
(4)  This chapter does not invalidate or render unenforceable any interest,
whether designated as an environmental covenant or other interest, that is
otherwise enforceable under Utah law.
